Massachusetts, session 194th, H775.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after section 75 the following section:-
Section 76. (a) There shall be a special commission established pursuant to section 2A of
chapter 4 of the General Laws to study the aging disabled adult population in the commonwealth.
The commission shall consist of: 1 member of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house, who shall serve as co-chair; 1 member of the senate appointed by the
senate president, who shall serve as co-chair; the secretary of the executive office of aging and
independence or a designee; the director of housing and community development or a designee;
the commissioner of public health or a designee; the director of the LGBT Aging Project or a
designee; a representative of the National Association on HIV Over Fifty, Inc.; the executive
director of Mass Home Care or a designee; the director of AARP Massachusetts or a designee;
the executive director of the Massachusetts Association of Councils on Aging, Inc. or a designee;
the director of the Massachusetts Senior Care Association, Inc. or a designee; the director of the
of 3

Home Care Aides Council or a designee and 5 members to be appointed by the governor, 1 of
whom shall be a member of the Massachusetts bar who practices elder law, 1 of whom shall be
an expert in adult disability public policy or research and 3 aging disabled adults. The governor's
appointees shall ensure that the commission has at least 1 representative from each of the
following areas: Cape Cod, western Massachusetts and central Massachusetts.
(b) The commission shall investigate, analyze and study the health, housing, financial,
social, psychosocial and long-term care needs of aging disabled adults and their caregivers and
shall make recommendations to improve access to benefits and services where appropriate and
necessary. In furtherance of its duties, the commission shall: (i) examine the impact of the
commonwealth's policies and regulations on aging disabled adults and make recommendations to
ensure equality of access, treatment, care and benefits; (ii) examine strategies to increase
provider awareness of the needs of aging disabled adults and their caregivers and improve the
competence of and access to treatment, services and ongoing care, including preventive care; (iii)
assess the funding and programming needed to enhance services to the growing population of
aging disabled adults; (iv) examine best practices for increasing access, reducing isolation,
preventing abuse and exploitation, promoting independence and self-determination,
strengthening caregiving, eliminating disparities and improving quality of life; (v) examine
whether certain policies and practices, or the absence of certain policies and practice, promote
the premature admission of aging disabled adults to institutional care; (vi) recommend, as
appropriate and necessary, lower cost and culturally appropriate home and community-based
alternatives to institutional care; (vii) examine the feasibility of developing statewide training
curricula to improve provider competency in the delivery of health, housing and long-term
support services to aging disabled adults and their caregivers; and (viii) examine outreach
of 3

protocols to reduce apprehension among aging disabled adults and their caregivers of utilizing
mainstream providers.
(c) The commission, in formulating its recommendations, shall consider the best policies
and practices in other states and jurisdictions. The commission may hold regular public
meetings, fact-finding hearings and other public forums as it considers necessary.
(d) The commission may accept and solicit funds, including any gifts, donations, grants
or bequests or any federal funds to further the purposes of this section. These funds shall be
deposited in a separate account with the state treasurer, shall be received by the treasurer on
behalf of the commonwealth and shall be expended by the commission in accordance with law.
(e) The commission shall submit a report on its activities and findings, including any
recommendations, to the governor, the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and
the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on elder affairs and shall file at least 1 report
by December 31 in the even-numbered years.
of 3